ru: Высота манжеты ботинка: Высокая; Низкая; Средняя; Съемная / регулируемая; Другое
vi: Chiều cao cổ giày: Cao; Thấp; Vừa; Tháo rời / có thể điều chỉnh; Khác
ja: カフの高さ: ハイ; ロー; ミディアム; 取り外し / 調整可能; その他
ro-RO: Înălțimea manșetei: Înalt; Jos; Mediu; Detașabil / ajustabil; Altele
hu: Szármagasság: Magas; Alacsony; Közepes; Levehető/állítható; Egyéb
de: Höhe der Manschette: Hoch; Niedrig; Mittel; Abnehmbar / verstellbar; Sonstige
en: Cuff height: High; Low; Medium; Removable / adjustable; Other
hr-HR: Visina manžete: Visoko; Nisko; Srednje; Uklonjivo/prilagodljivo; Ostalo
fr: Hauteur de la tige: Haut; Bas; Moyen; Amovible / réglable; Autre
ko: 커프 높이: 높음; 낮음; 중간; 탈부착 / 조절 가능; 기타
bg-BG: Височина на маншета: Висок; Нисък; Среден; Подвижен / регулируем; Други
pt-PT: Altura do punho: Alta; Baixa; Média; Removível/ajustável; Outra
th: ความสูงของขอบข้อมือ: สูง; ต่ำ; ปานกลาง; ถอด/ปรับได้; อื่นๆ
es: Altura del puño: Alto; Bajo; Medio; Extraíble/ajustable; Otro
sl-SI: Višina manšete: Visoka; Nizka; Srednja; Odstranljiva/prilagodljiva; Drugo
it: Altezza del polsino: Alta; Bassa; Media; Rimovibile/regolabile; Altro
nl: Manchethoogte: Hoog; Laag; Medium; Afneembaar / verstelbaar; Overig
sv: Manschetthöjd: Hög; Låg; Medium; Avtagbar/justerbar; Övrigt
da: Manchethøjde: Høj; Lav; Medium; Aftagelig/justerbar; Andet
sk-SK: Výška manžety: Vysoká; Nízka; Stredná; Odnímateľná / nastaviteľná; Iné
lt-LT: Aulo aukštis: Aukštas; Žemas; Vidutinis; Nuimamas / reguliuojamas; Kita
pt-BR: Altura do cano: Alto; Baixo; Médio; Removível/Ajustável; Outro
nb: Mansjetthøyde: Høy; Lav; Middels; Avtakbar/justerbar; Annet
fi: Saappaansuun korkeus: Korkea; Matala; Keskikorkea; Irrotettava / säädettävä; Muu
pl: Wysokość cholewki: Wysoki; Niski; Średni; Odpinany / regulowany; Inny
tr: Konç yüksekliği: Yüksek; Düşük; Orta; Çıkarılabilir / ayarlanabilir; Diğer
cs: Výška manžety: Vysoká; Nízká; Střední; Odnímatelná/nastavitelná; Ostatní
el: Ύψος μανσέτας: Ψηλή; Χαμηλή; Μεσαία; Αφαιρούμενη / Ρυθμιζόμενη; Άλλο
zh-CN: 袖口高度: 高; 低; 中; 可拆卸/可调节; 其他
zh-TW: 靴口高度: 高; 低; 中; 可拆卸 / 可調整; 其他